Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3709
Occupant,
defined.

Occupant means anyone
who, for a consideration, uses, possesses, or has a right to use or possess
any space in a hotel if the space is one ordinarily used for accommodations.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1250;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 9.